Utah statutes.
17-27a-708.   Final decision.

(1)  A decision of an appeal authority takes effect on the date when the appeal authority issues a written decision, or as otherwise provided by local ordinance.

(2)  A written decision, or other event as provided by ordinance, constitutes a final decision under Subsection 17-27a-801(2)(a) or a final action under Subsection 17-27a-801(4).

